Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-342
Bonds; issuance; delivery of certified transcript.

The secretary of the board of supervisors of the drainage district in which bonds are issued shall furnish a duly certified transcript to the holder of any such bond on demand.

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 10, p. 522;

R.S.1913, § 1837;

C.S.1922, § 1784;

C.S.1929, § 31-441;

R.S.1943, § 31-342;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 24.